Hawaii statutes.
§286-238.2 Commercial learner's
permit. (a) A commercial learner's permit shall be tamperproof; be marked
with the words "commercial learner's permit" or "CLP"
displayed prominently; include a statement that it is not valid for driving a
commercial motor vehicle unless presented with the underlying commercial
driver's license or non-commercial driver's license; and shall include but not
be limited to the following with respect to the licensee:

(1) The full name and current mailing, residential,
and business addresses;

(2) A physical description including sex and height;

(3) Date of birth;

(4) Signature;

(5) The date of issuance and the date of expiration
of the permit; and

(6) The driver's state license number.

The commercial learner's permit shall not contain a
photograph, digitized image, or other visual representation of the driver.

(b) A commercial
learner's permit may be issued for the following vehicle categories:

(1) Category A – Any combination of vehicles with a
gross combination weight rating of twenty-six thousand one pounds or more;
provided that the gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicles being towed is in
excess of ten thousand pounds;

(2) Category B – Any single vehicle with a gross
vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one pounds or more, or any such
vehicle towing a vehicle not in excess of ten thousand pounds; and

(3) Category C – Any single vehicle or combination of
vehicles that meets neither the definition of category A nor that of category
B, but that is either:

(A) Designed to transport sixteen or more
passengers; or

(B) Used in the transportation of hazardous
materials that require the vehicle to comply with title 49 Code of Federal
Regulations, part 172, subpart F.

(c) A commercial learner's permit may be issued
with any one or more of the following endorsements and restrictions:

(1) "P" – Authorizes driving passenger
carrying vehicles; a commercial learner's permit holder with a "P"
endorsement is prohibited from operating a commercial
motor vehicle carrying passengers, other than federal or state auditors and
inspectors, test examiners, other trainees, and the commercial driver's
license holder accompanying the commercial learner's
permit holder; this endorsement is vehicle class specific;

(2) "N" – Authorizes driving tank vehicles; a commercial learner's permit holder with an "N" endorsement may only operate with an empty tank vehicle
and is prohibited from operating any tank vehicle that
previously contained hazardous materials that has not been
purged of all residue;

(3) "S" – Authorizes driving school buses;
a commercial learner's permit holder with an "S" endorsement is prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle carrying passengers, other than
federal or state auditors and inspectors, test examiners, other trainees, and the commercial driver's license holder accompanying the commercial
learner's permit holder; this endorsement is vehicle class
specific;

(4) "P" – Restricts the driver from
carrying passengers other than federal or state auditors and
inspectors, test examiners, other trainees, and the commercial
driver's license holder accompanying the commercial
learner's permit holder; or

(5) "X" – Restricts the driver from
carrying cargo in a commercial motor vehicle tank and prohibits operating any tank vehicle that previously contained
hazardous materials that has not been purged of any residue.

(d) If the commercial learner's
permit is a non-domiciled commercial learner's permit, it must contain the
prominent statement that the permit is a "non-domiciled
commercial learner's permit", or "non-domiciled CLP", as appropriate; the word "non-domiciled" shall be conspicuously and
unmistakably displayed, but may be noncontiguous with the words "commercial learner's permit", or "CLP".

(e) Before issuing a commercial learner's
permit, the examiner of drivers shall complete a check of the applicant's
driving record as provided in section 286-239(d) or (g). [L 2013, c 114, §1; am
L 2014, c 72, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next